chu-morph-phon.xfst
!
! This file only contains a set of useful definitions. This is sourced
! from the other scripts that generate useful automata.
!

!
! Define some useful character classes
!

﻿! ăĂšŠĕĔüÜıİśŚčČ
! ăĕıüčśš

! Vowels
define Vf   e | i | ĕ | ü | E | İ | Ĕ | Ü | %^sFRV | %^sFUV;
define Vb   a | ı | ă | u | A | I | Ă | U | %^sBRV | %^sBUV;
define Vsh	ă | ĕ | Ă | Ĕ ;
define Vowel  Vf | Vb;
define Vbuf %^%(I%) | %^%(A%) | %^%(Ă%) ;
define Vxx  %^A | %^Ă | %^Ĕİ | %^I ;
define Vsilent %^sFRV | %^sFUV | %^sBRV | %^sBUV ; 
define Vall Vowel | Vxx | Vsilent; ! except buffer vowels
define Vsurface   e | i | ö | ü | E | İ | Ö | Ü | î | Î |
                  a | ı | o | u | A | I | O | U | â | Â | û | Û ;

! Consonants
define ConsV b | d | c | g | v | z | j | f | ğ | l | m | n | r | w | y | 
           B | D | C | G | V | Z | J | F | Ğ | L | M | N | R | W | Y | %^sVC;
define ConsUV p | t | ç | k | f | s | ş | h | ś | č |
            P | T | Ç | K | F | S | Ş | H | Ś | Č | %^sUC;
define Cons  ConsV | ConsUV;
define ConsBuf %^%(N%) ;
define ConsXX    %^c | %^p | %^t | %^k | %^g | %^K | %^D | %^C | %@LN | %^N;
define ConsSilent %^sVC |  %^sUC;
define ConsAll  Cons | ConsXX |ConsSilent; ! except buffers
define ConsSurface b | d | c | g | v | z | j | f | ğ | l | m | n | r | w | y | 
                   B | D | C | G | V | Z | J | F | Ğ | L | M | N | R | W | Y |
                   p | t | ç | k | f | s | ş | h | 
                   P | T | Ç | K | F | S | Ş | H ;

define SilentLetter Vsilent | ConsSilent;
define SurfaceLetter ConsSurface | Vsurface;

! Intermediate symbols with no surface forms
define Boundary %@MB | %@RB | %@dB ;
define IntSym   Boundary | %@NCOMP | %@opt3 | %@APOS | %^NS | %^NNS | %@DUP%@ | %@ALTU%@ | %@DELV%@;

define Digit %0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;

!
! Buffer deletion
!

define DelBufVow [Vbuf -> 0 || [Vowel | Vxx ] [IntSym]* _ ] 
             .o. [ %^%(Ă%) -> %^Ă ,
                   %^%(A%) -> %^A ] ;
define DelBufCons [ConsBuf -> 0 || [Cons | ConsXX | ă | ĕ ] [IntSym]* _ ] 
             .o. [ %^%(N%) -> %^N ] ;

define DelBuffers DelBufCons .o. DelBufVow ;

!
! Gen/Obj roots in -i n/y alternation
!

define NYAlternation [ %^N -> [y | 0] || i Boundary IntSym* _ ]
										.o. %^N -> n , %^N -> 0;

!
! Loc/Abl r/t alternation
!

define RTCAlternation [ %^R -> n č || %^Ĕİ Boundary IntSym* _ ]
										.o. [ %^R -> t , %^R2 -> č || [ l | n | r ] Boundary IntSym* _ ]
										.o. %^R -> r , %^R2 -> r ;

!
! 3rd person possessive E/I alternation
!

define 3rdPersPossAlternation [ t -> č || _ [IntSym]* %^Ĕİ ,,
																d -> č || _ [IntSym]* %^Ĕİ ]
												.o.		[ %^Ĕİ -> ĕ || [Cons | ConsXX] [IntSym]* %@DELV%@ _ ,,
																%^Ĕİ -> i || [Vowel | Vxx] [IntSym]* %@DELV%@ _ ] ;

!
! Delete final vowel in stem where marked
!

define FinalVowelDeletion [ Vowel -> 0 ||  _ Boundary %@DELV%@ ]
                   .o. %@DELV%@ -> 0;

!
! Nouns in -u stem alternation
!

define UStemAlternation [ u -> ă v ||  _ Boundary %@ALTU%@ ,,
													ü -> ĕ v ||  _ Boundary %@ALTU%@ ]
                   .o. %@ALTU%@ -> 0;

!
! Nouns in -CA stem alternation (gemination)
!

define GemStemAlternation [ l -> l l || \ConsAll _ Vsh Boundary IntSym* %@DUP%@ ,,
													  v -> v v || \ConsAll _ Vsh Boundary IntSym* %@DUP%@ ] 
										.o.	[ Vsh -> 0 || ConsAll ConsAll _ Boundary IntSym* %@ALTĂ%@ ]
										.o. %@DUP%@ -> 0 , %@ALTĂ%@ -> 0;

!
! Plural m/n alternation
!

define PluralAlternation [ %^M -> m || _ Boundary [p | .#.] ]
										.o. %^M -> n ;

!
! Negative present s/0 alternation
!

define NegPresSAlternation [ %^S -> 0 || _ Boundary IntSym* ś ]
										.o. %^S -> s ;


!
! Vowel Harmony
!

define VowelHarmony [ %^A -> a  //  Vb  \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^A -> e  //  Vf	\Vall* _  ,,
											%^Ă -> ă  //  Vb  \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^Ă -> ĕ  //  Vf	\Vall* _  ,,
											%^U -> u  //  Vb  \Vall* _  ,,
											%^U -> ü  //  Vf  \Vall* _ ];

!
! Delete morpheme boundaries
!

define DeleteBoundary ["@MB" | "@RB"] -> 0 ;




read regex GemStemAlternation
						.o. UStemAlternation
						.o. DelBufCons
						.o. NYAlternation
						.o. DelBufVow
						.o. RTCAlternation
						.o. 3rdPersPossAlternation
						.o. FinalVowelDeletion
						.o. PluralAlternation
						.o. NegPresSAlternation
						.o. VowelHarmony
						.o. DeleteBoundary
						;
